Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
AUTHORITY TO OFFER BENEFITS

§432:1-301 Registration with
commissioner: certificate of registration and certificate of authority.
(a) Before doing business or engaging in any act, any society as defined in
section 432:1-104(2) shall file with the commissioner:

(1) Copies of its constitution or organic instrument
under which it purports to operate, and the bylaws, and rules and regulations,
if any;

(2) If a society promising or offering to pay death,
sick, disability, or other benefits in an amount equal to or in excess of $25:

(A) Copies of all proposed forms of benefit
certificates, applications, and circulars to be issued by the society; and

(B) A bond in the sum of $25,000 with
sureties approved by the commissioner. The bond shall be conditioned upon the
return of the advance payments referred to in section 432:1-304, if the
organization is not completed within one year; and

(3) Any additional information as the commissioner
may require.

(b) Except as provided in section 432:1-302,
upon the filing of the information required by subsection (a), if it appears to
the commissioner's satisfaction that the purposes of the society are lawful,
not for profit, and for the benefit of its members, the commissioner shall
issue a certificate of registration authorizing the society to solicit members
as provided in section 432:1-303.

(c) Upon issuance of a certificate of
registration pursuant to subsection (b), the society may apply for a
certificate of authority. The applicant society shall provide to the
commissioner:

(1) Evidence of compliance with the special deposit
requirements of section 432:1-304; and

(2) A description of the procedures, approved by the
society's administrative board or body in accordance with its constitution and
bylaws, to be implemented to comply with the protection against insolvency
requirements of section 432:1-407.

(d) The applicant society that satisfies the
requirements of this chapter shall be issued a certificate of authority in
accordance with part II of article 3 of chapter 431. Societies that are
currently authorized to transact business in this State may continue to
transact business until August 16, 2013. The authority of societies and all
societies hereafter issued a certificate of authority may thereafter be
extended in accordance with section 432:1-108.

The applicant society may appeal a denial of
its application pursuant to chapter 91. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2004, c
122, §86; am L 2012, c 251, §4; am L 2015, c 63, §13]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next